Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB551.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. Are you in favor of amending Section 1 of the Constitution of
Kentucky to require the Commonwealth of Kentucky to establish a right of the people to
have a healthy environment, including clean air, pure water, and ecologically healthy
habitats, to declare the Commonwealth's natural resources are the common property of all
people, including the generations to come, and to maintain the environment and its
natural resources for the benefit of all people, as stated below?
Section 2. It is proposed that Section 1 of the Constitution of Kentucky be
amended to read as follows:
All men are, by nature, free and equal, and have certain inherent and inalienable
rights, among which may be reckoned:
First: The right of enjoying and defending their lives and liberties.
Second: The right of worshipping Almighty God according to the dictates of their
consciences.
Third: The right of seeking and pursuing their safety and happiness.
Fourth: The right of freely communicating their thoughts and opinions.
Fifth: The right of acquiring and protecting property.
Sixth: The right of assembling together in a peaceable manner for their common
good, and of applying to those invested with the power of government for redress of
grievances or other proper purposes, by petition, address or remonstrance.
Seventh: The right to bear arms in defense of themselves and of the State, subject to
the power of the General Assembly to enact laws to prevent persons from carrying
concealed weapons.
Eighth: The right to a healthy environment, including a right to clean air, pure
water, and ecologically healthy habitats. The Commonwealth's natural resources,
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1912
among them its air, water, fauna, climate, and public lands, are the common property
of all people, including generations yet to come. As trustee of the environment and its
natural resources, the Commonwealth shall conserve and maintain them for the
benefit of all people.
Section 3. This amendment shall be submitted to the voters of the
Commonwealth for their ratification or rejection at the time and in the manner provided
for under Sections 256 and 257 of the Constitution, KRS 118.415, and Sections 4 and 5
of this Act.
Section 4. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State shall cause the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this Act and the
entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky contained in Section
2 of this Act to be published at least one time in a newspaper of general circulation
published in this state, and shall also cause to be published at the same time and in the
same manner the fact that the amendment will be submitted to the voters for their
acceptance or rejection at the next regular election at which members of the General
Assembly are to be voted for. The publication required by this section and KRS 118.415
shall be made no later than the first Tuesday in August preceding the election at which
the amendment is to be voted on.
Section 5. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 118.415 to the contrary, the
Secretary of State, not later than the second Monday after the second Tuesday in August
preceding the next regular election at which members of the General Assembly are to be
chosen in a year in which there is not an election for President and Vice President of the
United States, or not later than the Thursday after the first Tuesday in September
preceding a regular election in a year in which there is an election for President and Vice
President of the United States, shall certify the entirety of the question in Section 1 of this
Act and the entirety of the proposed amendment to the Constitution of Kentucky
contained in Section 2 of this Act to the county clerk of each county, and the county clerk
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1912
shall have the entirety of the question and the amendment, as so certified, indicated on
the ballots provided to the voters in paper or electronic form as applicable to the voting
machines in use in each county or precinct.
Section 6. This Act may be cited as the Legacy Amendment.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 9:16 AM Jacketed